Maryland, session 2026, SB0100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
10–301.1.
(c) Each early voting center shall be open for voting as follows:
(1) beginning the second Thursday before a primary or general election
through the Thursday before the election; and
(2) during the hours between 7 a.m. and 8 p.m. each early voting day.
(E) (1) (I) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY WITH RESPECT TO A
FIXED LOCAL BUS ROUTE FUNDED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION AND
– 1 –

Ch. 107 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
OPERATED BY THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION OR A CONTRACTOR FOR
THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
1. AN EXPRESS OR A COMMUTER BUS ROUTE THAT HAS
LIMITED STOPS BETWEEN ITS ORIGIN AND DESTINATION;
2. A BUS ROUTE OPERATED BY THE MARYLAND TRANSIT
ADMINISTRATION; OR
3. A BUS ROUTE OPERATED BY THE WASHINGTON
METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY.
(2) IF AN EARLY VOTING CENTER IS LOCATED WITHIN ONE–HALF
MILE OF A FIXED LOCAL BUS ROUTE, EACH BUS OPERATING ON THAT ROUTE SHALL,
TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND CONSISTENT WITH ACCESSIBILITY
REQUIREMENTS, ALLOW PASSENGERS TO EMBARK AND DISEMBARK AT THE
ENTRANCE OF THE EARLY VOTING CENTER ON THE DAYS THE CENTER IS OPEN FOR
VOTING UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
[(e)] (F) Beginning 30 days prior to each early voting period the State Board and
each local board shall undertake steps to inform the public about early voting and the
location of early voting centers in each county, including:
(1) a series of public service media announcements;
(2) mailings to all registered voters in each county; and
(3) other measures as appropriate.
[(f)] (G) Except as expressly provided in this section, any provision of this article
that applies to voting on election day also applies to early voting.
[(g)] (H) The State Board shall adopt regulations and guidelines in accordance
with the requirements of this section for the conduct of early voting.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –